Louisiana, session 2026, HB40.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2225.4(A)(2)(d) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2225.4. Unfunded accrued liability; payment by employer
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
Paragraph, if, on the June thirtieth immediately following the transfer of employees
from one police department that is a participating employer of the Municipal Police
Employees' Retirement System to another police department that is also a
participating employer of the system, the transferring employer is deemed to have
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-176 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 40
partially dissolved its police department, the system shall determine whether the
partial dissolution would have occurred without the transfer of employees. If no
partial dissolution would have occurred without the transfer, and the employees who
transferred remain members of the system, the employer shall not be required to
make the payments otherwise required by this Section. If the system determines that
a partial dissolution would have occurred regardless of the transfer, and the
transferred employees remain members of the system, then the amount due pursuant
to the provisions of this Section shall be calculated without regard to the transferred
employees.
* * *